Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 6 Manufacturing and Wholesale Licenses

3-6-1.
Manufacturer’s license.

A manufacturer’s license authorizes the holder to establish and operate a brewery, distillery, or winery at the place described in the license for the manufacture of beverages within this state. The license does not authorize more than one of the activities of operator of a brewery or distillery or winery and a separate license shall be required for each plant.

The license also authorizes the sale at wholesale, at the licensed place by the manufacturer of the product of the licensed plant, to another license holder and the transportation and delivery from the place of sale to a licensed place or to a common carrier for that delivery. The license does authorize the sale of beverages for consumption on premises where sold; provided that the manufacturer does not sell an amount in excess of forty-eight ounces (48 oz.) of malt beverage or four and one-half ounces (4.5 oz.) of distilled spirits per visitor, per day, or a combination not greater than three (3) drinks where a drink is defined as up to sixteen ounces (16 oz.) of beer or one and one-half ounces (1.5 oz.) of spirits, for consumption on the premises. The license also authorizes the sale of beverages produced on the premises in an amount not in excess of forty-eight (48) twelve-ounce (12 oz.) bottles or cans or forty-eight (48) sixteen-ounce (16 oz.) bottles or cans of malt beverages, or one thousand five hundred milliliters (1,500 ml) of distilled spirits per visitor, per day, to be sold in containers that may hold no more than seventy-two ounces (72 oz.) each. These beverages may be sold to the consumers for off-premises consumption, and shall be sold pursuant to the laws governing retail Class A establishments. The containers for the sale of beverages for off-premises consumption shall be sealed. The license does not authorize the sale of beverages in this state for delivery outside this state in violation of the law of the place of delivery. The license holder may provide to visitors, in conjunction with a tour or tasting, samples, clearly marked as samples, not to exceed three hundred seventy-five milliliters (375 ml) per visitor for distilled spirits and seventy-two ounces (72 oz.) per visitor for malt beverages at the licensed plant by the manufacturer of the product of the licensed plant to visitors for off-premises consumption. The license does not authorize providing samples to a visitor of any alcoholic beverages for off-premises consumption that are not manufactured at the licensed plant. All manufacturer licenses conducting retail sales or providing samples shall be subject to compliance with alcohol server training and liquor liability insurance requirements set forth in §§

3-7-6.1

and

3-7-29

and the regulations promulgated thereunder.

The annual fee for the license is three thousand dollars ($3,000) for a distillery producing more than fifty thousand gallons (50,000 gal.) per year and five hundred dollars ($500) for a distillery producing less than or equal to fifty thousand gallons (50,000 gal.) per year; five hundred dollars ($500) for a brewery; and one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for a winery producing more than fifty thousand gallons (50,000 gal.) per year and five hundred dollars ($500) per year for a winery producing less than fifty thousand gallons (50,000 gal.) per year. All those fees are prorated to the year ending December 1 in every calendar year and shall be paid to the general treasurer for the use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 12, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-6-1

; P.L. 1978, ch. 223, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 9; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 30, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 462, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 463, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 13, § 1; 2016, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 176, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 289, § 3; P.L. 2019, ch. 269, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 313, § 1, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 314, § 1, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 192, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 193, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

3-6-1.1.
Farmer-winery licenses — Fee.

For the purpose of encouraging the development of domestic vineyards, the department shall issue a farmer-winery license to any applicant of the state and to applying partnerships and to applying corporations organized under the laws of any other state of the United States and admitted to do business in this state.

A winegrower may operate a farmer’s winery under any conditions the department may prescribe by regulation.

A winegrower may import fruit, flowers, herbs, and vegetables to produce not more than seven thousand five hundred (7,500) gallons of wine during his or her first year of operation, not more than five thousand (5,000) gallons during his or her second year of operation, not more than two thousand five hundred (2,500) gallons during his or her third year of operation and not more than one thousand (1,000) gallons per year thereafter.

If a winegrower suffers crop failure in his or her vineyard in a particular year to the extent that the fruit yield from his or her vineyard that year is at least twenty-five percent (25%) below the average yield for the previous two (2) years, the winegrower may import fruit into the state during that year in an amount equal to the difference between the current year’s yield and the average for the previous two (2) years. A winegrower shall not import unfermented juice, wine or alcohol into the state.

A winegrower may sell wine or winery products under his or her label and fermented by him or her or another winegrower licensed by the state. He or she may sell wine or winery products:

At wholesale to any person holding a valid license to manufacture alcoholic beverages;

At wholesale to any person holding a valid wholesaler’s and importer’s license under §§

3-6-9

—

3-6-11

;

At wholesale to any person holding a valid farmer-winery license under this section;

At retail by the bottle to consumers for consumption off the winery premises; provided, however a winegrower shall not sell wine at retail for delivery off the site of the winery premises in Rhode Island directly to Rhode Island residents, except in the manner provided for like sales and shipment in §

3-4-8

.

At wholesale to any person in any state or territory in which the importation and sale of wine is not prohibited by law;

At wholesale to any person in any foreign country;

At wholesale to liquor dealers holding a valid license under the provisions of title 3;

At wholesale to restaurants holding a valid license under the provisions of title 3; and

At retail by the bottle or by the glass for consumption on the winery premises.

A winegrower may not sell at retail to consumers any wine or winery product not fermented in the state and sold under the brand name of the winery.

A winegrower may serve complimentary samples of wine produced by the winery where the wine is fermented in the state and sold under the winery brand name.

All wines sold by a licensee shall be sold under any conditions and with any labels or other marks to identify the producer as the department may prescribe.

Every applicant for a farmer-winery license shall, at the time of filing an application, pay a license fee based on a reasonable estimate of the amount of wine to be produced during the year covered by the license. Persons holding farmer-winery licenses shall report annually at the end of the year covered by the license the amount of wine produced during that year. If the total amount of wine produced during the year is less than the amount permitted by the fee already paid, the state shall reimburse the licensee for whatever fee was paid in excess. If the total amount of wine produced during the year exceeds the amount permitted by the fee already paid, the licensee shall pay whatever additional fee is owing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 223, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 9; P.L. 2005, ch. 330, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 60, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 64, § 1.

3-6-1.2.
Brewpub manufacturer’s license.

A brewpub manufacturer’s license shall authorize the holder to establish and operate a brewpub within this state. The brewpub manufacturer’s license shall authorize the retail sale of the beverages manufactured on the location for consumption on the premises. The license shall not authorize the retail sale of beverages from any location other than the location set forth in the license. A brewpub may sell at retail alcoholic beverages produced on the premises by the half-gallon bottle known as a “growler” to consumers for off the premises consumption to be sold pursuant to the laws governing retail Class A establishments. The license also authorizes the sale of beverages produced on the premises in an amount not in excess of forty-eight (48) twelve-ounce (12 oz.) bottles or cans or forty-eight (48) sixteen-ounce (16 oz.) bottles or cans of malt beverages, or one thousand five hundred milliliters (1,500 ml) of distilled spirits per visitor, per day, to be sold in containers that may hold no more than seventy-two ounces (72 oz.) each. These beverages may be sold to the consumers for off-premises consumption, and shall be sold pursuant to the laws governing retail Class A establishments.

The license shall also authorize the sale at wholesale at the licensed place by the manufacturer of the product of his or her licensed plant as well as beverages produced for the brewpub and sold under the brewpub’s name to a holder of a wholesaler’s license and the transportation and delivery from the place of sale to the licensed wholesaler or to a common carrier for that delivery.

The brewpub manufacturer’s license further authorizes the sale of beverages manufactured on the premises to any person holding a valid wholesaler’s and importer’s license under §

3-6-9

or §

3-6-11

.

The annual fee for the license is one thousand dollars ($1,000) for a brewpub producing more than fifty thousand gallons (50,000 gal.) per year and five hundred dollars ($500) per year for a brewpub producing less than fifty thousand gallons (50,000 gal.) per year. The annual fee shall be prorated to the year ending December 1 in every calendar year and paid to the general treasurer for the use of the state.

A holder of a brewpub manufacturer’s license will be permitted to sell, with take-out food orders, up to two (2) seven hundred fifty millimeter (750 ml) bottles of wine or the equivalent volume of wine in smaller factory sealed containers, or seventy-two ounces (72 oz.) of mixed wine-based drinks or single-serving wine in containers sealed in such a way as to prevent re-opening without obvious evidence that the seal was removed or broken, one hundred forty-four ounces (144 oz.) of beer or mixed beverages in original factory sealed containers, and one hundred forty-four ounces (144 oz.) of draft beer or seventy-two ounces (72 oz.) of mixed beverages containing not more than nine ounces (9 oz.) of distilled spirits in growlers, bottles, or other containers sealed in such a way as to prevent re-opening without obvious evidence that the seal was removed or broken, provided such sales shall be made in accordance with § 1.4.10 of the department of business regulation (DBR) liquor control administration regulations,

230-RICR-30-10-1

, and any other DBR regulations.

Delivery of alcoholic beverages with food from a brewpub licensee is prohibited.

The provisions of subsection (e) and (e)(1) of this section shall remain permanent and any sunset provision pursuant to P.L. 2021, ch. 129, § 3 or P.L. 2021, ch. 130, § 3 shall be void.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 472, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 9; P.L. 1997, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 30, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 176, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 289, § 3; P.L. 2021, ch. 129, § 2, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 130, § 2, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 313, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 314, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 3, § 1, effective February 16, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 4, § 1, effective February 16, 2022.

3-6-2.
Rectifying as manufacturing.

With a view to the enforcement of the provisions of this title, and of the conditions, rules and regulations established and authorized by the department pertaining to rectifiers and those regarded as being in the business of rectifying, the business of manufacturing beverages may be deemed to include the business of rectifying beverages unless the context otherwise requires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1937, ch. 2524, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 166, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-6-2

; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 9.

3-6-3.
Rectifier’s license.

The department is authorized to issue rectifiers’ licenses in accordance with the provisions of §§

3-6-4

—

3-6-8

. The fee provided shall be prorated to the year ending December 1 in every calendar year and be paid to the general treasurer for the use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1937, ch. 2524, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 12, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-6-3

; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 9; P.L. 2018, ch. 176, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 289, § 3.

3-6-4.
Practices requiring rectifier’s license.

Any person who rectifies, purifies, refines or blends distilled spirits or wines by any process, other than by original and continuous distillation from mash, wort, or wash, through continuous closed vessels and pipes until the manufacture is complete, and every wholesale or retail licensee who has in his or her possession any still or leach tub, or who keeps any other apparatus for the purpose of refining in any manner distilled spirits and wines, and any person who without rectifying, purifying or refining distilled spirits mixes such spirits, wines or other liquor with any material, manufactures any spurious, imitation or compound liquors for sale under the name of whiskey, brandy, gin, rum, wine, spirits, cordials or wine bitters, or any other name, is regarded as a rectifier engaged in the business of rectifying. Nothing in this section shall be held to prohibit the purifying or refining of spirits in the course of original and continuous distillation through any material which will not remain incorporated with those spirits when the manufacture of the spirits is complete.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1937, ch. 2524, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 166, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-6-4

.

3-6-5.
Privileges conferred by rectifier’s license.

A rectifier’s license authorizes the holder to engage in the business of rectifying and blending at the place described for the rectifying, purifying, refining, blending, warehousing and bottling of distilled spirits and wines within this state by any process other than by original and continuous distillation from mash, wort, or wash, through continuous closed vessels and pipes, until the manufacturing is complete. A separate license is required for each plant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1937, ch. 2524, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 166, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-6-5

.

3-6-6.
Bottling and sale privileges of a rectifier’s license.

A rectifier’s license also authorizes the license holder to bottle distilled spirits and wines without rectifying or blending and authorizes the sale at wholesale at the licensed place by the rectifier of the distilled spirits and wines rectified, blended, warehoused or bottled at his or her licensed plant to another license holder and the transportation and the delivery from the place of sale to the licensed place or to a common carrier for that delivery. It shall not authorize the sale of beverages for consumption on the premises where sold, nor the sale of beverages within this state for delivery outside the state in violation of the law of the place of delivery.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1937, ch. 2524, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 12, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

3-6-6

.

3-6-7.
Annual rectifier’s license fee.

The annual fee for a rectifier’s license is five hundred dollars ($500). The fee is prorated to the year ending December 1 in each calendar year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1937, ch. 2524, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 12, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

3-6-7

; P.L. 2018, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 226, § 1.

3-6-8.
Supervision of rectifying.

The department of business regulation has general supervision of the conduct of the business of rectifying, and the right, power and jurisdiction to issue a rectifier’s license is solely in that department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1937, ch. 2524, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 166, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-6-8

.

3-6-9.
Wholesaler’s license — Class A.

A wholesaler’s license, Class A, authorizes the holder to keep for sale and to sell malt beverages and wines at wholesale at the place described to holders of licenses under this title within this state and to holders of wholesale licenses in other states and the transportation and delivery from the place of sale to those license holders or to a common carrier for that delivery. Sales by a wholesaler in this state to a holder of a wholesale license in another state shall be only to a wholesaler who is a distributor of the same brand of malt beverages or wines subject to permission by the department. The license shall not authorize the sale of malt beverages or wines for consumption on the premises where sold nor their sale for their delivery outside this state in violation of the law of the place of delivery. The annual fee for the license is two thousand dollars ($2,000) prorated to the year ending December 1 in every calendar year, and shall be paid to the general treasurer for the use of the state. Whenever any malt beverages or wines are sold outside the state pursuant to this section, refunds or credits of import fees previously paid on those malt beverages or wines shall be made to holders of wholesaler’s licenses under this title in accordance with regulations promulgated by the division of taxation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1934 (S.S.), ch. 2173, § 1; P.L. 1934 (S.S.), ch. 2174, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 12, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

3-6-9

; P.L. 1960, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 9; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 30, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 176, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 289, § 3.

3-6-10.
Wholesaler’s license — Class B.

A wholesaler’s license, Class B, authorizes the holder to keep for sale and to sell malt and vinous beverages and distilled spirits at wholesale, at the place described in the license, to holders of licenses under this title within this state and to holders of wholesale licenses in other states and authorizes the transportation and delivery from the place of sale to those license holders or to a common carrier for that delivery. Sales by a wholesaler in this state to a holder of a wholesale license in another state shall be only to a wholesaler who is a distributor of the same brand of malt beverages, vinous beverages, and distilled spirits subject to permission by the state liquor control administrator. The license shall not authorize the sale of beverages for consumption on the premises where sold nor the sale of beverages for delivery outside this state in violation of the law of the place of delivery.

The annual fee for the license is four thousand dollars ($4,000) prorated to the year ending December 1 in every calendar year, and shall be paid to the general treasurer for the use of the state whenever any malt beverages, vinous beverages, and distilled spirits are sold outside the state pursuant to this section. Refunds or credits of import fees previously paid on malt beverages, vinous beverages and distilled spirits shall be made to holders of wholesaler’s licenses under this title in accordance with regulations promulgated by the division of taxation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1934 (S.S.), ch. 2173, § 1; P.L. 1934 (S.S.), ch. 2174, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 12, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

3-6-10

; P.L. 1960, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 9; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 30, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 176, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 289, § 3.

3-6-11.
Wholesaler’s Class C license.

A wholesaler’s Class C license authorizes the holder to manufacture, transport, import, export, deliver, and sell alcohol for mechanical, manufacturing, medicinal, or chemical purposes only, or to any registered pharmacist, licensed pharmacy, drug store, or apothecary shop, or to any registered physician or dentist, or to any hospital or educational or scientific institution, for use other than beverage purposes. The annual fee for the license is two hundred dollars ($200) and shall be paid to the general treasurer for the use of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; P.L. 1940, ch. 815, § 1; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 12, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

3-6-11

; P.L. 1960, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 9; P.L. 2018, ch. 176, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 289, § 3.

3-6-12.
Agents’ licenses.

Any person who represents a distillery, winery, or brewery is deemed and taken to be acting as an agent for and on behalf of that distillery, winery, or brewery, and is required to have received from the department a license to act as an agent. The annual fee for that license is fifty dollars ($50.00) paid to the general treasurer. The department may, after notice, suspend or revoke any license for cause.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 9; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 30, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 176, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 289, § 3.

3-6-13.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 22; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 9; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 12, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

3-6-13

; P.L. 1987, ch. 78, § 11; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 9; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 2, § 43; Repealed by P.L. 2018, ch. 176, § 2, effective July 2, 2018; P.L. 2018, ch. 289, § 2, effective July 2, 2018.

3-6-14.
Certificate of compliance.

As conditions precedent to transporting, or causing to be transported, distilled spirits, malt beverages, and vinous beverages into this state for storage, sale, or consumption in this state, any person, firm, or corporation located in another state shall first obtain a certificate of compliance from the department.

The certificate of compliance shall be issued upon the condition that the holder furnishes from time to time, as the department may require, but in no event more often than once each month, information concerning all shipments or sales of distilled spirits, malt beverages, and vinous beverages made into this state. The holder must also furnish information concerning the brand, type of container, quantity, and other information that may be required by the department. The department is empowered to promulgate any rules and regulations that may be necessary for the enforcement of this subsection.

As a condition precedent to the issuance of and during the term of a certificate, the holder shall comply with the provisions of this title, and all rules and regulations promulgated under authority of this title.

The department may suspend, cancel, or revoke any certificate of compliance for violation of the terms or conditions of the certificate.

The certificate of compliance shall contain on its face a list of those distilled spirits, malt beverages, and vinous beverages transported or caused to be transported into this state by the holder of the certificate.

The annual fee for the certificate of compliance is forty dollars ($40.00) for each and every brand, blend, mixture, variety, type, kind, and class of distilled spirits, malt beverages, and vinous beverages. The annual fee, prorated to the year ending December 1st in every calendar year, is paid to the department, and deposited as general revenues. The department may fix a flat fee per gallon instead of the annual fee for any of the above categories where the application for a certificate of compliance contains an affidavit that less than twenty-five (25) gallons of the category involved will be imported during the year for which filed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

3-6-14

; P.L. 1959, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 240, § l; P.L. 1987, ch. 95, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 9; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 20; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 30, § 1.

3-6-14.1.
Pricing restrictions — Affirmation of price compliance.

No holder of a certificate of compliance for distilled spirits or vinous beverages shall ship, transport, or deliver within this state, or sell or offer for sale, to a wholesaler, any brand of distilled spirits or vinous beverages at a bottle or case price higher than the lowest price at which that item is then being sold or offered for sale or shipped, transported, or delivered by the holder of a certificate of compliance to any wholesaler in any other state of the United States or in the District of Columbia or to any state, including an agency of the state, which owns and operates retail liquor outlets.

Prior to the shipment of distilled spirits or vinous beverages, the holder of a certificate of compliance, or the authorized representative of the holder, shall file with the department a written affirmation under oath by the holder of the certificate of compliance certifying that at the time of filing the bottle or case price to the wholesaler is no higher than the lowest price at which each item of distilled spirits or vinous beverages is being sold, offered for sale, shipped, transported, or delivered by that holder to any wholesaler in any other state in the United States or in the District of Columbia, or to any state or agency of a state which owns and operates retail liquor outlets.

A holder of a certificate of compliance may file the affirmation required by this section once and may certify that the affirmation remains in full force and effect until amended as set forth in this title.

In determining the lowest price for which any item or distilled spirits or vinous beverages is or was sold, offered for sale, shipped, transported or delivered by the holder of a certificate of compliance to a wholesaler in any other state or in the District of Columbia or to any state or state agency which owns and operates retail liquor outlets, appropriate reductions will be made for all discounts, rebates, free goods, allowances and other inducements of any kind whatever offered or given to the wholesaler in another state or in the District of Columbia or to any state agency which owns and operates retail liquor outlets. Differentials in price which make only due allowances for differences in state taxes and fees and for the actual cost of delivery are permissible. As used in this section, “state taxes and fees” means the excise taxes imposed or the fees required by any state or the District of Columbia upon or based upon a gallon of alcoholic liquor and “gallon” means one hundred twenty-eight (128) fluid ounces.

This section shall not preclude the holder of a certificate of compliance from lowering prices to any wholesaler in any other state of the United States or in the District of Columbia, or to any state or agency of a state which owns and operates retail liquor outlets at any time but notice of this change shall be set forth in an amendment to the affirmation on file in the office of the department. This amendment shall be under oath and shall be filed within ten (10) days from the date of this change in price.

The department shall enforce the provisions of this section and make any regulations that are necessary to carry out its provisions.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

3-6-14.1

; P.L. 1974, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 539, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 9.

3-6-15.
Manufacturer’s interest in business of wholesaler prohibited.

No manufacturer of distilled spirits or wines whose principal place of manufacture is outside of this state shall hold a wholesaler’s license issued under this title or shall have any interest in a wholesaler’s license, either directly or indirectly, as an owner or part owner, or through a subsidiary or affiliate, or by any officers, directors, or employees of the manufacturer, or by stock ownership, interlocking directors, trusteeship, loan, mortgage or by being a guarantor, endorser or surety of any obligation of a wholesaler.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

3-6-15

; P.L. 1968, ch. 96, § 1.

3-6-16.
Purchases by wholesalers from distilleries, wineries, rectifiers, breweries and certain importers only.

The holders of wholesale licenses in this state shall purchase beverages only from the distillery, rectifier, winery or brewery manufacturing the beverages or from the importer holding the basic contract with a foreign supplier whereby that foreign supplier exports distilled spirits, wines or malt beverages into the United States. Any wholesaler, who, prior to May 16, 1975, has made regular purchases from the agent specifically designated by a distillery, rectifier, winery, brewery or importer for the express purpose of making sales of distilled spirits, wines or malt beverages to wholesalers in states other than the one in which the agent is licensed and located, may continue to make those purchases from the agent.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to purchases by wholesalers in this state from other wholesalers in this state nor shall the provisions of this section apply to purchases of distilled spirits, wines or malt beverages by wholesalers in this state from wholesalers in another state who sell the same brand of distilled spirits, wines or malt beverages if those purchases are made only to fill in temporary shortages of inventory.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

3-6-16

; P.L. 1975, ch. 107, § 1.

3-6-17.
Penalties for violations.

A violation of any provision of this chapter is punishable, upon conviction, by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 187, § 1.